en: Nailers & Staplers
xx: Nailers & Staplers
cs: Hřebíkovačky a nastřelovací pistole
da: Sømsmede og hæftemaskiner
de: Nagler & Tacker
es: Clavadoras y grapadoras
fr: Cloueuses et agrafeuses
it: Sparachiodi e spillatrici
ja: 釘打機
nl: Spijker- en nietpistolen
no: Spikerpistoler og stiftemaskiner
pl: Gwoździarki i zszywacze
pt: Máquinas de pregar e grampear
ru: Гвоздезабивные устройства и степлеры
sv: Spikpistoler och häftpistoler
tr: Çivi Çakıcılar ve Zımbalar

en: Oil Filter Drains
xx: Oil Filter Drains
cs: Pomůcky pro vypouštění oleje
da: Dræn til oliefiltre
de: Ölfilterabfluss
es: Desagües de filtros de aceite
fr: Systèmes de purge pour filtres à huile
it: Scarichi per filtri dell'olio
ja: オイルフィルタードレン
nl: Systemen voor het leeghalen van oliefilters
no: Oljefiltertømmere
pl: Korki spustowe oleju
pt: Drenos de filtros de óleo
ru: Сливы для масляных фильтров
sv: Dränering av oljefilter
tr: Yağ Filtresi Drenleri

en: Paint Tools
xx: Paint Tools
cs: Malířské nástroje
da: Maleredskaber
de: Malerwerkzeug
es: Herramientas de pintura
fr: Outils de peinture, Outillage du peintre, Abj Outillage du Peintre Usage
it: Articoli per verniciatura
ja: 塗装用品
nl: Verfbenodigdheden
no: Maleverktøy
pl: Narzędzia malarskie
pt: Ferramentas para pintura
ru: Малярные инструменты
sv: Målarverktyg
tr: Boya Aletleri

en: Airbrushes
xx: Airbrushes
cs: Stříkací pistole pro airbrush
da: Luftpensler
de: Airbrushpistolen
es: Aerógrafos
fr: Aérographes
it: Aerografi
ja: エアブラシ
nl: Verfsprays
no: Malingsprøyter
pl: Aerografy
pt: Aerógrafos
ru: Аэрографы
sv: Sprayflaskor
tr: Havalı Boya Tabancaları

en: Paint Brushes
xx: Paint Brushes
cs: Malířské štětce
da: Malepensler
de: Malerpinsel
es: Brochas de pintura
fr: Pinceaux
it: Pennelli da pittura
ja: ペイントブラシ
nl: Verfkwasten
no: Malerpensler
pl: Pędzle do malowania
pt: Pincéis para tinta
ru: Малярные кисти
sv: Målarpenslar
tr: Boya Fırçaları

en: Paint Edgers
xx: Paint Edgers
cs: Linkovací strojky
da: Kantpensler
de: Kantenmaler
es: Rodillos para esquinas
fr: Rouleaux à peinture spécial contours
it: Accessori per dipingere i bordi
ja: ペイントエッジャー
nl: Verfmaterialen voor het verven van hoeken
no: Kantmalere
pl: Wałki do malowania rogów
pt: Rolos de cantos
ru: Угловые кисти
sv: Målardynor
tr: Boya Kenar Fırçaları

en: Paint Rollers
xx: Paint Rollers
cs: Malířské válečky
da: Maleruller
de: Farbrollen
es: Rodillos
fr: Rouleaux à peinture
it: Rulli per vernici
ja: ペイントローラー
nl: Verfrollers
no: Malerruller
pl: Wałki malarskie
pt: Rolos de pintura
ru: Малярные валики
sv: Rollers
tr: Boya Ruloları

en: Paint Shakers
xx: Paint Shakers
cs: Stroje na míchání barev
da: Malingsblandere
de: Farbrüttler
es: Agitadoras de pinturas
fr: Mélangeurs de peinture
it: Miscelatori per vernice
ja: ペイントシェーカー
nl: Verfschudders
no: Malingsblandere
pl: Mieszalniki farb
pt: Misturadores de tinta
ru: Шейкеры для краски
sv: Färgskakare
tr: Boya Çalkalayıcılar

en: Paint Sponges
xx: Paint Sponges
cs: Malířské houby
da: Malesvampe
de: Malschwämme
es: Esponjas
fr: Éponges à peinture
it: Spugne per vernici
ja: ペイントスポンジ
nl: Verfsponzen
no: Malersvamper
pl: Gąbki malarskie
pt: Esponjas de pintura
ru: Малярные губки
sv: Målarsvampar
tr: Boya Süngerleri

en: Paint Sprayers
xx: Paint Sprayers
cs: Stříkací pistole
da: Spraymaling
de: Farbspritzpistolen
es: Pulverizadores de pintura
fr: Pistolets à peinture
it: Spruzzatori vernici
ja: スプレーガン
nl: Verfspuiten
no: Malingssprøyter
pl: Pistolety natryskowe
pt: Pulverizadores de pintura
ru: Краскопульты
sv: Färgsprutor
tr: Boya Tabancaları

en: Paint Strainers
xx: Paint Strainers
cs: Sítka na barvu
da: Siposer til maling
de: Farbsiebe
es: Coladores de pintura
fr: Tamis de peinture
it: Filtri per vernice
ja: ペイントストレーナー
nl: Verfzeven
no: Malingssiler
pl: Sitka do farb
pt: Coadores de tinta
ru: Фильтры для краски
sv: Färgsilar
tr: Boya Süzgeçleri

en: Paint Trays
xx: Paint Trays
cs: Nádoby na barvu
da: Malebakker
de: Farbwannen
es: Bandejas de pintura
fr: Bacs à peinture
it: Vassoi per vernici
ja: ペイントローラー受け皿
nl: Verfbakjes
no: Malingbrett
pl: Tacki malarskie
pt: Bandejas para pintura
ru: Поддоны для краски
sv: Färgtråg
tr: Boya Paletleri

en: Pickup Tools
xx: Pickup Tools
cs: Prodloužené ruce
da: Opsamlingsværktøjer
de: Müll- & Papierkrallen
es: Herramientas de recogida
fr: Outils de ramassage
it: Attrezzi per raccogliere oggetti
ja: ピックアップツール
nl: Tilgereedschap
no: Gripeverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do chwytania
pt: Ferramentas para recolher materiais
ru: Захватные устройства
sv: Gripverktyg
tr: Tutma Aletleri

en: Pipe & Bar Benders
xx: Pipe & Bar Benders
cs: Ohýbačky tyčí a trubek
da: Bukkemaskiner
de: Biegewerkzeuge für Rohre & Stangen
es: Dobladoras
fr: Plieuses de tuyaux et barres
it: Piegatubi e curvatubi
ja: パイプベンダー
nl: Buigtangen
no: Rør- og stangbøyere
pl: Zginacze do rur i prętów
pt: Entortadores de tubos
ru: Устройства для гибки труб и арматуры
sv: Böjverktyg
tr: Boru Bükücüler

en: Pipe & Tube Cleaners
xx: Pipe & Tube Cleaners
cs: Čističe potrubí
da: Slangerensere
de: Rohrreiniger
es: Limpiadores de tuberías
fr: Matériel de débouchage des canalisations
it: Pulizia tubi e condutture
ja: パイプ清掃器具
nl: Buis- en leidingreinigers
no: Rør- og slangerensere
pl: Urządzenia do czyszczenia rur
pt: Limpadores de tubos e canos
ru: Устройства для чистки труб
sv: Rörrengöring
tr: Boru Temizleyiciler

en: Pipe Brushes
xx: Pipe Brushes
cs: Kartáče
da: Rørbørster
de: Rohrbürsten
es: Escobillas para tubos
fr: Brosses à tubes
it: Spazzole per tubi
ja: パイプブラシ
nl: Pijpenrager
no: Rørbørster
pl: Szczotki do rur
pt: Pincéis para canos
ru: Щётки для чистки трубопроводов
sv: Rörborstar
tr: Boru Temizleme Fırçaları

en: Planers
xx: Planers
cs: Hoblovky
da: Høvlemaskiner
de: Elektrohobel
es: Cepilladoras
fr: Raboteuses
it: Piallatrici
ja: 電気カンナ
nl: Schaafmachines
no: Elektriske høvler
pl: Strugarki wzdłużne
pt: Plainas elétricas
ru: Строгальные станки
sv: Hyvelmaskiner
tr: Planyalar

en: Planes
xx: Planes
cs: Hoblíky
da: Høvle
de: Hobel
es: Cepillos carpinteros
fr: Rabots
it: Pialle
ja: カンナ
nl: Schaven
no: Høvler
pl: Heble
pt: Plainas manuais
ru: Рубанки
sv: Hyvlar
tr: El Planyaları

en: Pliers
xx: Pliers
cs: Kleště
da: Tænger
de: Zangen
es: Alicates
fr: Pinces, Pince (outil de bricolage)
it: Pinze da ferramenta
ja: ペンチ
nl: Grijptangen
no: Tenger
pl: Kombinerki
pt: Alicates
ru: Плоскогубцы
sv: Tänger
tr: Kerpetenler

en: Plungers
xx: Plungers
cs: Zvony
da: Svuppere
de: Saugglocken
es: Desatascadores
fr: Ventouses
it: Sturalavandini
ja: ラバーカップ
nl: Ontstoppers
no: Klosettpumper
pl: Przepychacze
pt: Pistões
ru: Вантузы
sv: Vaskrensare
tr: Dalıcı Pistonlar